Illinois, session 104th, HB1865.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 424 and by adding Section 427.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/424)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1031)7    Sec. 424. Unfair methods of competition and unfair or 8deceptive acts or practices defined. The following are hereby 9defined as unfair methods of competition and unfair and 10deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:11        (1) The commission by any person of any one or more of 12    the acts defined or prohibited by Sections 134, 143.24c, 13    147, 148, 149, 151, 155.22, 155.22a, 155.42, 236, 237, 14    364, 469, and 513b1 of this Code.15        (2) Entering into any agreement to commit, or by any 16    concerted action committing, any act of boycott, coercion 17    or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in 18    unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, the business of 19    insurance.20        (3) Making or permitting, in the case of insurance of 21    the types enumerated in Classes 1, 2, and 3 of Section 4, 22    any unfair discrimination between individuals or risks of 23    the same class or of essentially the same hazard and   HB1865 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10517 SPS 20592 b1    expense element because of the race, color, religion, or 2    national origin of such insurance risks or applicants. The 3    application of this Article to the types of insurance 4    enumerated in Class 1 of Section 4 shall in no way limit, 5    reduce, or impair the protections and remedies already 6    provided for by Sections 236 and 364 of this Code or any 7    other provision of this Code.8        (4) Engaging in any of the acts or practices defined 9    in or prohibited by Sections 154.5 through 154.8 of this 10    Code.11        (5) Making or charging any rate for insurance against 12    losses arising from the use or ownership of a motor 13    vehicle which requires a higher premium of any person by 14    reason of his physical disability, race, color, religion, 15    or national origin.16        (6) Failing to meet any requirement of the Unclaimed 17    Life Insurance Benefits Act with such frequency as to 18    constitute a general business practice. 19        (7) Soliciting either an individual who is a resident 20    of a nursing home or long-term care facility or an 21    individual who is over the age of 65 to purchase accident 22    or health insurance, unless the person who is selling the 23    insurance:24            (A) advises the potential enrollee of the benefit 25        of examining the potential enrollee's current 26        insurance plan, discusses all proposed   HB1865 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10517 SPS 20592 b1        insurance-related changes with a family member, 2        friend, or other advisor of the potential enrollee, 3        and then waits 48 hours before making any 4        insurance-related changes concerning the potential 5        enrollee;6            (B) provides a phone number that may be called if 7        the potential enrollee or the potential enrollee's 8        family members, friends, or other advisors have any 9        questions; and10            (C) allows the potential enrollee to opt out of 11        any future communications with the person.12        (8) Entering into or amending an accident or health 13    insurance policy with an individual who is over the age of 14    65 and who has executed a health care power of attorney or 15    has a medical condition, such as dementia, that reduces 16    the person's capacity to make informed decisions 17    independently, unless the potential enrollee's agent under 18    a health care power of attorney executes the agreement and 19    the agreement is reduced to writing.20(Source: P.A. 102-778, eff. 7-1-22.) 21    (215 ILCS 5/427.5 new)22    Sec. 427.5. Unfair and deceptive agreements voidable by 23the Director. If, after a hearing under Section 426, the 24Director determines that a person has violated paragraph (7) 25or (8) of Section 424, the Director may declare void and   HB1865 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10517 SPS 20592 b1unenforceable any agreement or policy of insurance solicited, 2entered into, or amended as a result of that violation. 3    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 4Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 5    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)6    Sec. 2HHHH. Disruptive changes to a nursing home resident. 7It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act for a 8nursing home or long-term care facility to make substantive 9changes likely to be disruptive to a resident or move a 10resident's place of living without prior approval from a 11family member, guardian, or power of attorney of the resident 12if the resident suffers from dementia or suffers from a 13medical condition that reduces the resident's capacity to make 14informed decisions independently.